Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF4595.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 148B.35, is amended to read: 148B.35 RECIPROCITY WITH OTHER STATES. The board shall issue a marriage and family therapist's license to an individual who holds a current license as a marriage and family therapist from another jurisdiction if the deleted text begin board determines that the standards for licensure in the other jurisdiction are at least equivalent to or exceed the requirements of sections 148B.29 to 148B.392 and the rules of the board.deleted text end new text begin individual:new text end new text begin (1) completes an application for licensure by reciprocity on a form provided by the board and submits the applicable fees under section 148B.392; new text end new text begin (2) holds a current, valid, and unrestricted license from another jurisdiction to practice as a marriage and family therapist; new text end new text begin (3) is licensed in good standing in each jurisdiction in which the individual currently holds a license to practice as a marriage and family therapist and is not the subject of disciplinary action or a pending investigation by any jurisdiction's licensing authority for marriage and family therapists; new text end new text begin (4) has not been convicted of a crime that would disqualify the individual from licensure, as determined by the board; and new text end new text begin (5) has passed a Minnesota jurisprudence examination approved by the board. new text end